Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.033

Law enforcement officers—Training—Criminal justice training commission.

(1) All training relating to the handling of domestic violence complaints by law enforcement officers must stress enforcement of criminal laws in domestic situations, availability of community resources, and protection of the victim. Law enforcement agencies and community organizations with expertise in the issue of domestic violence shall cooperate in all aspects of such training.

(2) The criminal justice training commission shall implement by July 28, 2019, a course of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in Washington in the handling of domestic violence complaints. The basic law enforcement curriculum of the criminal justice training commission must include at least twenty hours of basic training instruction on the law enforcement response to domestic violence. The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, and the standards for the training must be developed by the commission and focus on enforcing the criminal laws, safety of the victim, and holding the perpetrator accountable for the violence. The curriculum must include training on the extent and prevalence of domestic violence, the importance of criminal justice intervention, techniques for responding to incidents that minimize the likelihood of officer injury and that promote victim safety, investigation and interviewing skills, evidence gathering and report writing, assistance to and services for victims and children, verification and enforcement of court orders, liability, and any additional provisions that are necessary to carry out the intention of this subsection.

(3) The criminal justice training commission shall develop and update annually an in-service training program to familiarize law enforcement officers with domestic violence laws. The program must include techniques for handling incidents of domestic violence that minimize the likelihood of injury to the officer and that promote the safety of all parties. The commission shall make the training program available to all law enforcement agencies in the state.

(4) Development of the training in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be conducted in conjunction with agencies having a primary responsibility for serving victims of domestic violence with emergency shelter and other services, and representatives to the statewide organization providing training and education to these organizations and to the general public.

(5) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose:

(a) The curriculum required in subsection (2) of this section must include trauma-informed investigation and interviewing skills, domestic violence homicide prevention, the intersection of firearms and domestic violence, best practices for serving and enforcing protection orders, and assistance to and services for victims and children; and

(b) The in-service training program required in subsection (3) of this section must include training on domestic violence homicide prevention, the intersection of firearms and domestic violence, best practices for serving and enforcing protection orders, and assistance to and services for victims and children.

[ 2023 c 462 s 301; 2019 c 367 s 2.]